test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_moola_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  Noun - moolâ:
    moolâ+N+Sg+Nom: mooḷâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Gen: moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Acc: moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Ill: mooḷân
    moolâ+N+Sg+Loc: moolâst
    moolâ+N+Sg+Com: mooláin
    moolâ+N+Sg+Abe: moˊlâttáá
    moolâ+N+Ess: moollân
    moolâ+N+Par: moollâd
    moolâ+N+Pl+Nom: moolah
    moolâ+N+Pl+Gen: [moolâi, moˊlâi]
    moolâ+N+Pl+Acc: moolâid
    moolâ+N+Pl+Ill: mooláid
    moolâ+N+Pl+Loc: moolâin
    moolâ+N+Pl+Com: moˊlâiguin
    moolâ+N+Pl+Abe: moˊlâittáá
    
  Noun - kielâ:
    kielâ+N+Sg+Nom: kieḷâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Gen: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Acc: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Ill: kieḷân
    kielâ+N+Sg+Loc: kielâst
    kielâ+N+Sg+Com: kieláin
    kielâ+N+Sg+Abe: kieˊlâttáá
    kielâ+N+Ess: kiellân
    kielâ+N+Par: kiellâd
    kielâ+N+Pl+Nom: kielah
    kielâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kielâi, kieˊlâi]
    kielâ+N+Pl+Acc: kielâid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Ill: kieláid 
    kielâ+N+Pl+Loc: kielâin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Com: kieˊlâiguin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Abe: kieˊlâittáá
    
    
  Noun - njuolâ:
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuoḷâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuoḷân
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuolâst
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Com: njuoláin
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuoˊlâttáá
    njuolâ+N+Ess: njuollân
    njuolâ+N+Par: njuollâd
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuolah
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Gen: [njuolâi, njuoˊlâi]
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuolâid
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuoláid
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuolâin
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Com: njuoˊlâiguin
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuoˊlâittáá
        
  Noun - paarâ: # MOOLA
    paarâ+N+Sg+Nom: paaṛâ
    paarâ+N+Sg+Gen: paarâ
    paarâ+N+Sg+Acc: paarâ
    paarâ+N+Sg+Ill: paaṛân
    paarâ+N+Sg+Loc: paarâst
    paarâ+N+Sg+Com: paaráin
    paarâ+N+Sg+Abe: paˊrâttáá
    paarâ+N+Ess:    paarrân
    paarâ+N+Par:    paarrâd
    paarâ+N+Pl+Nom: paarah
    paarâ+N+Pl+Gen: [paarâi, paˊrâi]
    paarâ+N+Pl+Acc: paarâid
    paarâ+N+Pl+Ill: paaráid
    paarâ+N+Pl+Loc: paarâin
    paarâ+N+Pl+Com: paˊrâiguin
    paarâ+N+Pl+Abe: paˊrâittáá
